South Dakota, session 2026, SB142.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 12-27-22 be AMENDED:
12-27-22. The treasurer of a political committee listed below shall file the
following campaign finance disclosure statements with the secretary of state:
(1) For a candidate or candidate campaign committee for any statewide office:
(a) A pre-primary statement;
(b) A pre-general statement;
(c) An annual year-end statement;
(d) A supplemental report as provided in § 12-27-28, if applicable; and
(e) If applicable, amendments to any information provided on a prior
statement;
(2) For a candidate or candidate campaign committee for a legislative or county office
with a recognized political party:
(a) A pre-primary statement;
(b) A pre-general statement;
(c) An annual year-end statement;
(d) A supplemental report as provided in § 12-27-28, if applicable; and
(e) If applicable, amendments to any information provided on a prior
statement;
(3) For a statewide political action committee:
(a) A pre-primary statement;
(b) A pre-general statement;
(c) An annual year-end statement;
(d) A supplemental report as provided in § 12-27-28, if applicable; and

26.805.12 2 142
(e) If applicable, amendments to any information provided on a prior
statement;
(4) For a statewide political party:
(a) A pre-primary statement;
(b) A pre-general statement;
(c) An annual year-end statement;
(d) A supplemental report as provided in § 12-27-28, if applicable; and
(e) If applicable, amendments to any information provided on a prior
statement;
(5) For a county political party and auxiliary organization:
(a) A pre-primary statement;
(b) A pre-general statement;
(c) An annual year-end statement;
(d) A supplemental report as provided in § 12-27-28, if applicable; and
(e) If applicable, amendments to any information provided on a prior
statement; and
(6) For a statewide ballot question committee:
(a) A pre-primary statement;
(b) A pre-general statement;
(c) An annual year-end statement;
(d) A supplemental report as provided in § 12-27-28, if applicable; and
(e) If applicable, amendments to any information provided on a prior
statement.
The treasurer of a political committee listed in this section may submit a
termination statement at any time.
If a political party loses the status of a qualified party, the party must file a
termination statement by five p.m. central time on the last Friday in January following the
calendar year in which the qualified party status was lost. If a statewide ballot question
committee does not list any activity on the next required campaign finance statement
submitted to the secretary of state, that committee has until the next reporting period to
report activity. If that committee does not have any activity to report by the next reporting
period, the committee must submit a termination statement by that reporting period
deadline.
A violation of this section is a Class 2 misdemeanor. A subsequent offense within
a calendar year is a Class 1 misdemeanor.
SB142 ENROLLED

26.805.12 3 142
Section 2. This Act is effective beginning January 1, 2027.
SB142 ENROLLED

26.805.12 4 142
An Act to amend the requirements for filing certain campaign finance disclosure statements.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
Senate as Bill No. 142
By
Secretary of the Senate for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
President of the Senate ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Secretary of the Senate
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
Speaker of the House
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of State
Senate Bill No. 142 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
SB142 ENROLLED